Wyoming, session 2025, HB0334.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 41-3-1002(e) and 41-3-1007 by
creating a new subsection (b) and by renumbering (b) as (c)
are amended to read:

41-3-1002. Instream flows to be by stream segment;
waters for instream flows may be sold, transferred or
otherwise conveyed under certain restrictions; ownership
restricted.

HB0334

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0792
(e) No person other than The state of Wyoming shall
or any person may own any instream flow water right.

41-3-1007. Acquisition of existing rights for
instream flow purposes.

(b) Any person may acquire an existing water right or
petition for a change of use for instream flow purposes in
accordance with this chapter.

(b)(c) Any such water rights acquired and changed
shall be limited to a specified stream segment by the board
of control with priority date intact.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0334